Washington statutes.
RCW 13.36.080

Appointment of guardian ad litem or attorney for the child.

In all proceedings to establish, modify, or terminate a guardianship order, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem or attorney for the child. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or attorney who represented the child in a prior proceeding under this chapter or under chapter 13.34 RCW, or may appoint an attorney to supersede an existing guardian ad litem.

[ 2010 c 272 s 8.]